Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-3,111
Farmers and ranchers; special permits;
fee.

Special permits may be supplied by the department and
issued by the county treasurer for truck-tractor and semitrailer combinations
of farmers or ranchers used wholly and exclusively to carry their own supplies,
farm equipment, and household goods to or from the owner's farm or ranch or
used by the farmer or rancher to carry his or her own agricultural products
to or from storage or market. Such special permits shall be valid for periods
of thirty days and shall be carried in the cab of the truck-tractor. The fee
for such permit shall be equivalent to one-twelfth of the regular commercial
registration fee as determined by gross vehicle weight and size limitations
as defined in sections 60-6,288 to 60-6,294, but the fee shall be no less
than twenty-five dollars. Such fee shall be collected and distributed in the
same manner as other motor vehicle fees.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 111;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 67.